Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 201671-3906
Operator, owner, or lessee; civil
penalty.

Any
operator, owner of a tanning facility, or lessee of a tanning facility who
allows any person less than sixteen years of age to use tanning equipment
at the tanning facility without being accompanied by the parent or legal guardian
who signed the statement required under section 71-3905 shall be subject to
a civil penalty of one hundred dollars to be imposed and collected by the
department. The department shall remit the civil penalty to the State Treasurer
for distribution in accordance with Article VII, section 5, of the Constitution
of Nebraska.

Laws 2014, LB132, § 6.